Missouri, session 2026, HB2394.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 341, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 341.240, to read as follows:
341.240. 1. For purposes of this section, "plumber's license" means any license,
certificate, registration, or permit that enables an individual to legally engage in the
business of plumbing in a particular jurisdiction after passing a test approved by the
division of professional registration within the department of commerce and insurance.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any political
subdivision that requires an individual to obtain a plumber's license before engaging in
the business of plumbing in the political subdivision shall recognize a valid current
plumber's license issued by another political subdivision in the state as sufficient for its
purposes and waive its own licensure requirement for the license holder if the license
holder successfully passed an examination approved by the division of professional
registration in order to obtain the plumber's license from the other political subdivision.
The license holder still shall obtain a business license in the other political subdivision.
3. Reciprocity shall be extended to the holder of a license issued before August
28, 2026, if the holder was required to pass a test to obtain the license.
4. (1) This section shall apply to an individual who is a plumber's apprentice, a
journeyman plumber, or a master plumber.
(2) This section shall not be construed to apply to a plumbing foreman.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.